North Carolina, session 2025, HB1209.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds
beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated for the North Carolina New Teacher
Support Program (Program) to establish a sustainable, statewide approach to embedding
structured new teacher support directly within local school administrative units.
*H1209-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. The funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act shall be used in
programs designed to address the specific needs of teachers who will begin their teaching careers
in North Carolina public schools, including at least the following:
(1) Partnering with educator preparation programs to extend support beyond
graduation.
(2) Aligning coaching with evidence-based practices introduced during educator
preparation.
(3) Creating feedback loops between local school administrative units and
educator preparation programs to continuously strengthen training.
(4) Supporting a seamless transition from pre-service clinical experiences to
in-service professional practice.
(5) In-district coaching within a local school administrative unit that is aligned to
daily instruction.
(6) Hub-based staffing structures to maximize efficiency across low-wealth
counties.
(7) Consistent, research-based support frameworks that improve instructional
practice and student outcomes.
(8) Targeted investment in high-need rural districts, where teacher turnover is
highest.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1209-First Edition